Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.030

Chair to administer oaths.

The chair or presiding member of any committee of either the senate, house of representatives, or any joint committee thereof, shall be authorized to administer oaths to all witnesses coming before such committee for examination; and all witnesses who shall testify in any proceeding provided for in this chapter, shall be under oath or affirmation.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6004; 1895 c 6 s 2; RRS s 8179.]